Arkansas, session 2025, HB1106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Office of the Treasurer of State for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q243U TREAS SENIOR INVESTMENT MANAGER 2 GRADE SPC09
(2) Q244U TREAS CHIEF DEPUTY TREASURER 1 GRADE EXE01
(3) Q348U TREAS CHIEF OF STAFF 1 GRADE EXE01
(4) Q098U TREAS CHIEF COMPLIANCE OFFICER 1 GRADE SPC09
(5) Q352U TREAS CHIEF TECHNOLOGY OFFICER 1 GRADE IST11
*JAR032*
04-07-2025 14:51:11 JAR032

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1106
(6) Q154U TREAS CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER 1 GRADE SPC09
(7) Q366U TREAS DIRECTOR OF INVESTMENT ACCOUNTING 1 GRADE SPC07
(8) Q236U TREAS DIVISION DIRECTOR 3 GRADE SPC06
(9) Q349U TREAS DIR OF 529 & FINANCIAL EDUCATION 1 GRADE SPC06
(10) Q350U TREAS INVESTMENT MANAGER I 1 GRADE SPC04
(11) Q361U TREAS ATTORNEY 1 GRADE SPC08
(12) Q425U DIR OF GOV AFFAIRS AND SPECIAL PROJECTS 1 GRADE SPC05
(13) Q360U TREAS INVESTMENT MANAGER II 1 GRADE SPC04
(14) Q351U TREAS MANAGER V 2 GRADE SPC03
(15) Q245U TREAS MANAGER IV 1 GRADE SPC03
(16) Q237U TREAS MANAGER III 1 GRADE SPC01
(17) Q445U EXECUTIVE ASST TO THE TREASURER 1 GRADE SGS07
(18) Q367U TREAS EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT 1 GRADE SGS05
(19) Q362U TREAS ASSIST FOR 529 & FINANCIAL ED 1 GRADE SPC01
(20) Q238U TREAS MANAGER II 2 GRADE SGS04
(21) Q170U TREAS ASSISTANT IV 1 GRADE SGS06
(22) Q094U TREAS ASSISTANT III 3 GRADE SGS04
(23) Q085U TREAS ASSISTANT II 4 GRADE SGS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 33

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Office of the Treasurer of State for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: five
(5) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to
exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or
its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Office of the Treasurer of State, to be payable from the State Central
Services Fund, for personal services, operating expenses, data processing
system/services, debt collection and Financial/Educational Programs including
the Arkansas 529 College Savings Program, Arkansas ABLE Program and financial
education of the Office of the Treasurer of State for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

04-07-2025 14:51:11 JAR032

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1106
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,219,376
(02) EXTRA HELP 40,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,065,517
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,404,455
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 35,000
(C) PROF. FEES 35,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 25,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) DATA PROCESSING SYST/SERVICES 1,800,000
(06) FINANCIAL/EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS 75,000
(07) PREPAREDNESS, SECURITY & SAFETY 275,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $7,974,348

SECTION 4. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER PROVISION. After receiving approval from the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State, and prior review by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee, the Treasurer of State is authorized to transfer
appropriation from any line item authorized in Operations Appropriation of
the Treasurer's Office in this Act to any other line item authorized in
Operations Appropriation.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 5. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SALARIES.
Employees of the Office of the Treasurer of State shall be eligible for cost-
of-living increases on July 1, in an amount equal to that granted to all
other state agency, board, commission, or institution of higher education
employees on those dates. Any additional adjustments in annual salary rates
for employees, labor market adjustments, merit pay adjustments or employee
retention, or recruitment requirements shall be made at the discretion of the
Treasurer. In addition, the Treasurer may implement a merit program to
04-07-2025 14:51:11 JAR032

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1106
reward employees for exceptional service. In order that exceptionally well-
qualified personnel may be recruited and retained, the Office of the
Treasurer of State may exceed the maximum salary levels by no more than
twenty percent (20%) for no more than one-fourth (1/4) of the positions
authorized in the appropriation act after receiving approval from the
Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee. Salary payments in
accordance with this section shall not be restricted to maximum amounts
authorized by law.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly has
determined that the Office of the Treasurer of State may operate more
efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Office of the Treasurer of
State authorizing broad powers under this section. Therefore, it is both
necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by
requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If
the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction,
this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 6. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.
04-07-2025 14:51:11 JAR032

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1106

SECTION 7. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 8. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee













04-07-2025 14:51:11 JAR032